src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/V-T-A-ipohkisstoyi_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

   Verb - ipohkisstoyi - ok : # -m animate transitive verb, bring to town AEW NA1
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kitsipohkisstoyoo
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: nitsipohkisstoyaawa
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+1Sg+4SgO: nitsipohkisstoyaayini
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kitsipohkisstoyooki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: kitsipohkisstoyaawa
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+2Sg+4SgO: kitsipohkisstoyaayini
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: nitsipohkisstoyooka
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+3Sg+2SgO: kitsipohkisstoyooka
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+3Sg+4SgO: poohkisstoyiyiiwa
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+4Sg+3SgO: otsipohkisstoyooka
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+4Sg+2SgO: kitsipohkisstoyookini
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+4Sg+1SgO: nitsipohkisstoyookini
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: poohkisstoyiyiiyi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4SgO: otsipohkisstoyookini
     
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+1Pl+2PlO: kitsipohkisstoyoohpinnaana
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: nitsipohkisstoyaannaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+1Pl+4PlO: nitsipohkisstoyaannaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: poohkisstoyaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+21Pl+4PlO: poohkisstoyaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: kitsipohkisstoyookihpinnaana
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: kitsipohkisstoyaawaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+2Pl+4PlO: kitsipohkisstoyaawaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+3Pl+1PlO: nitsipohkisstoyookinnaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+3Pl+2PlO: kitsipohkisstoyookoaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+3Pl+4PlO: poohkisstoyiyiiyi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+1PlO: nitsipohkisstoyookinnaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+2PlO: kitsipohkisstoyookoaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+3PlO: otsipohkisstoyookoaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+4Pl+5Sg/PlO: poohkisstoyiyiiyi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+5Sg/Pl+4PlO: otsipohkisstoyookoaayini
 
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1SgO: nitsipohkisstoyookoo
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+1PlO: nitsipohkisstoyootsspinnaana
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2SgO: kitsipohkisstoyookoo
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+2PlO: kitsipohkisstoyootsspoaawa
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+21PlO: poohkisstoyootssp
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3SgO: poohkisstoyaawa
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+3PlO: poohkisstoyaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4SgO: poohkisstoyaayini
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Ind+Unspec+4PlO: poohkisstoyaayi

     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+2SgO: kitsipohkisstoyoohsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+3SgO: nitsipohkisstoyaahsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+1Sg+4SgO: nitsipohkisstoyaahsini
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+1SgO: kitsipohkisstoyookssi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+3SgO: kitsipohkisstoyaahsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+2Sg+4SgO: kitsipohkisstoyaahsini
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+1SgO: nitsipohkisstoyiyssi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+2SgO: kitsipohkisstoyiyssi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+3Sg+4SgO: otsipohkisstoyaahsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+4Sg+3SgO: otsipohkisstoyiyssi

     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+2PlO: kitsipohkisstoyoohsinnaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+3PlO: nitsipohkisstoyaahsinnaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+1Pl+4PlO: nitsipohkisstoyaahsinnaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+3PlO: poohkisstoyaahsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+21Pl+4PlO: poohkisstoyaahsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+1PlO: kitsipohkisstoyookssinnaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+3PlO: kitsipohkisstoyaahsoaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+2Pl+4PlO: kitsipohkisstoyaahsoaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+1PlO: nitsipohkisstoyiyssinnaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+21PlO: nitsipohkisstoyookssi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+2PlO: kitsipohkisstoyiyssoaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+3Pl+4PlO: otsipohkisstoyaahsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+4PlO: otsipohkisstoyiyssi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+4Pl+3PlO: otsipohkisstoyiyssi

     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1SgO: nitsipohkisstoyookoohsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+1PlO: nitsipohkisstoyootssinnaani
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2SgO: kitsipohkisstoyookoohsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+2PlO: kitsipohkisstoyootssoaayi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+21PlO: poohkisstoyootssi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3SgO: poohkisstoyaahsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+3PlO: poohkisstoyaahsi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Cnj+Unspec+4SgO: poohkisstoyaahsini

     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2SgO: poohkisstoyiiniki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3SgO: poohkisstoyaainiki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1SgO: poohkisstoyookiiniki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3SgO: poohkisstoyaainiki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1SgO: poohkisstoyootsiiniki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2SgO: poohkisstoyootsiiniki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4SgO: poohkisstoyaasi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3SgO: poohkisstoyootsiiniki

     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+2PlO: poohkisstoyiinoainiki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: poohkisstoyaainiki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+1PlO: poohkisstoyookinnaaniki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+2Sg+3PlO: poohkisstoyaainiki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+1PlO: poohkisstoyootsiinnaaniki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+21PlO: poohkisstoyookisi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+2PlO: poohkisstoyootsiinoainiki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+3Sg+4PlO: poohkisstoyaasi
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+4Sg+3PlO: poohkisstoyootsiinoainiki

     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1SgO: poohkisstoyookoiniki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+1PlO: poohkisstoyookoinnaaniki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2SgO: poohkisstoyookoiniki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+2PlO: poohkisstoyookoinoainiki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+21PlO: poohkisstoyootsski
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3SgO: poohkisstoyaahki
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Sbj+Unspec+3PlO: poohkisstoyaahki

     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1SgO: poohkisstoyookit
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+1PlO: poohkisstoyookinnaana
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3SgO: poohkisstoyiis
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Imp+2Sg+3PlO: poohkisstoyiis
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1SgO: poohkisstoyookik
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+1PlO: poohkisstoyookinnaana
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3SgO: poohkisstoyiik
     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Imp+2Pl+3PlO: poohkisstoyiik

     ipohkisstoyi+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI+Ind+1Pl: [ nitsipohkisstoyootsiiyihpinnaana , nitsipohkisstoyootsiiyihpinnaan ]
     
